Utah statutes.
32B-4-407.   Unlawful sale, offer for sale, or furnishing during emergency.

During a period of emergency proclaimed by the governor to exist in an area of the state, it is unlawful for a person to sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product in that area if the director publicly announces and directs that in that area a person may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product in that area during the period of emergency.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

